Wisconsin, session 2025, AB496.
do enact as follows:AB496,11Section 1. 118.60 (2) (a) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB496,2,102118.60 (2) (a) 1. a. Except as provided in par. (bm), the pupil is a member of a 3family that has a total family income that does not exceed an amount equal to 3.0 4times the poverty level determined in accordance with criteria established by the 5director of the federal office of management and budget. In this subdivision and 6sub. (3m), family income includes income of the pupil’s parents or legal guardians. 7Except as provided in subd. 1. c. and d., the The family income of the pupil shall be 8verified as provided in subd. 1. b. A pupil attending a private school under this 9section whose family income increases may continue to attend a private school 10under this section.AB496,211Section 2. 118.60 (2) (a) 1. c. and d. of the statutes are repealed.AB496,312Section 3. 118.60 (2) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB496,3,213118.60 (2) (bm) No pupil who resides in a school district, other than an eligible 14school district or a 1st class city school district, may attend a participating private 15school under this section unless the pupil is a member of a family that has a total 16family income that does not exceed an amount equal to 2.2 times the poverty level, 17determined in accordance with criteria established by the director of the federal 18office of management and budget. In this paragraph and sub. (3m), family income 19includes income of the pupil’s parents or legal guardians. Except as provided in par. 20(a) 1. c., the The family income of the pupil shall be verified as provided in par. (a) 1. 1b. A pupil attending a private school under this section whose family income 2increases may continue to attend a private school under this section.AB496,43Section 4. 119.23 (2) (a) 1. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB496,3,134119.23 (2) (a) 1. a. The pupil is a member of a family that has a total family 5income that does not exceed an amount equal to 3.0 times the poverty level 6determined in accordance with criteria established by the director of the federal 7office of management and budget. In this subdivision and sub. (3m), family income 8includes income of the pupil’s parents or legal guardians. Except as provided in 9subd. 1. d., the The family income of the pupil shall be verified as provided in subd. 101. b. A pupil attending a private school under this section whose family income 11increases, including a pupil who attended a private school under this section in the 122010-11 school year and whose family income has increased, may continue to attend 13a private school under this section.AB496,514Section 5. 119.23 (2) (a) 1. d. of the statutes is repealed.AB496,615Section 6. Initial applicability.AB496,3,1716(1) This act first applies to an application to participate in a program under s. 17118.60 or 119.23 in the 2026-27 school year.AB496,3,1818